District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.325

Authorization for grant-managing entity.

For Fiscal Year 2016, the DC Campaign to Prevent Teen Pregnancy (“DC Campaign”) is designated as the grant-managing entity. The DC Campaign shall be required to enter into a Memorandum of Understanding (“MOU”) with the District of Columbia government. The MOU shall set forth certain administrative requirements for the DC Campaign to abide by when it obtains District funds and awards subgrants involving District funds, and will clarify and reaffirm the DC Campaign’s responsibility and obligation with respect to District funds, including the monitoring of the use of District funds.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5146, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5052, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “For Fiscal Year 2016” for “For Fiscal Year 2015.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5052 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).